Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,123
Applicability of act.

The Title Insurance Agent Act applies to all activities or agreements of a title insurance agent engaged in or entered into on or after September 13, 1997. The title insurance agent shall amend all existing agreements to comply with section 44-19,114 within sixty days after September 13, 1997.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 46.